Vermont statutes. Title 30 Public Service
Subchapter 1. General Provisions
§ 8006a.
Greenhouse gas reduction credits.

Standard offer adjustment. In accordance with this section, greenhouse gas reduction credits generated by an eligible ratepayer shall result in an adjustment of the standard offer under subdivision 8005a(c)(1) of this title (cumulative capacity; pace). For the purpose of adjusting the standard offer under subdivision 8005a(c)(1) of this title, the amount of a year’s greenhouse gas reduction credits shall be the lesser of the following:

The amount of greenhouse gas reduction credits created by the eligible ratepayers served by all providers.

The providers’ annual retail electric sales during that year to those eligible ratepayers creating greenhouse gas reduction credits.

Definitions. In this section:

“Eligible ratepayer” means a customer of a Vermont retail electricity provider who takes service at 115 kilovolts and has demonstrated to the Commission that it has a comprehensive energy and environmental management program. Provision of the customer’s certification issued under standard 14001 (environmental management systems) of the International Organization for Standardization (ISO) shall constitute such a demonstration.

“Eligible reduction” means a reduction in non-energy-related greenhouse gas emissions from manufacturing processes at an in-state facility of an eligible ratepayer, provided that each of the following applies:

The reduction results from a specific project undertaken by the eligible ratepayer at the in-state facility after January 1, 2012.

The specific project reduces or avoids greenhouse gas emissions above and beyond any reductions of such emissions required by federal and State statutes and rules.

The reductions are quantifiable and verified by an independent third party as approved by the Commission. Such independent third parties shall be certified by a body accredited by the American National Standards Institute (ANSI) as having a certification program that meets the ISO standards applicable to verification and validation of greenhouse gas assertions.

“Greenhouse gas” shall be as defined under

10 V.S.A. § 552

.

“Greenhouse gas reduction credit” means a credit for eligible reductions, calculated in accordance with subsection (c) of this section and expressed as a kWh credit.

Calculation. Greenhouse gas reduction credits shall be calculated as follows:

Eligible reductions shall be quantified in metric tons of CO2 equivalent, in accordance with the methodologies specified under 40 C.F.R. part 98, and may be counted annually for the life of the specific project that resulted in the reduction.

Metric tons of CO2 equivalent quantified under subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be converted into units of energy through calculation of the equivalent number of kWh of generation by renewable energy plants, other than biomass, that would be required to achieve the same level of greenhouse gas emission reduction through the displacement of market power purchases. For the purpose of this subdivision, the value of the avoided greenhouse gas emissions shall be based on the aggregate greenhouse gas emission characteristics of system power in the regional transmission area overseen by the Independent System Operator of New England (ISO-NE).

Reporting. An eligible ratepayer shall report to the Commission annually on each specific project undertaken to create eligible reductions. The Commission shall specify the required contents of such reports, which shall be publicly available.

Savings. A provider shall pass on savings that it realizes through greenhouse gas reduction credits proportionally to the eligible ratepayers generating the credits.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. May 18, 2012.

§ 8007.
Small renewable energy plants; simplified procedures.

The same application form, rules, and procedures that the Commission applies to net metering systems of 150 kilowatts (kW) or less under sections 248 and 8010 of this title shall apply to the review under section 248 of this title of any renewable energy plant with a plant capacity of 150 kW or less and to the interconnection of such a plant with the system of a Vermont retail electricity provider. This requirement includes any waivers of criteria under section 248 of this title made pursuant to section 8010 of this title.

With respect to renewable energy plants that have a plant capacity that is greater than 150 kW and is 2.2 MW or less, the Commission shall establish by rule or order standards and procedures governing application for, and issuance or revocation of, a certificate of public good for such a plant under the provisions of section 248 of this title, and the interconnection of such a plant with the system of a Vermont retail electricity provider.

In developing such rules or orders, the Commission:

Shall waive the requirements of section 248 of this title that are not applicable to such a plant, including, for a plant that is not owned by a Vermont retail electricity provider, criteria that are generally applicable to such a provider.

May modify notice and hearing requirements of this title as it deems appropriate.

Shall simplify the petition and review process as appropriate.

Notwithstanding

1 V.S.A. §§ 213

and 214, a petitioner whose petition under section 248 of this title is pending as of the effective date of a Commission rule or order under this subsection (b) may elect to apply the standards and procedures of such a rule or order to the pending petition if the petition pertains to a renewable energy plant with a plant capacity that is greater than 150 kW and is 2.2 MW or less.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. June 4, 2010;

2013, No. 99

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. Jan. 1, 2017.

§ 8008.
Agreements; attribute revenues; disposition by Commission.

As used in this section, “the revenues” means revenues that are from the sale, through tradeable renewable energy certificates or other means, of environmental attributes associated with the generation of renewable energy from a system of generation resources with a total plant capacity greater than 200 MW and that are received by a Vermont retail electricity provider on or after May 1, 2012, pursuant to an agreement, contract, memorandum of understanding, or other transaction in which a person or entity agrees to transfer such revenues or rights associated with such attributes to the provider.

After notice and opportunity for hearing, the Commission shall determine the disposition, allocation, and use of the revenues in a manner that promotes State energy policy as stated in section 202a of this title and the goals of this chapter and supports achievement of the greenhouse gas reduction and building efficiency goals contained in

10 V.S.A. §§ 578(a)

and 581.

The Commission shall provide notice of the proceeding to each Vermont retail electricity provider, the Department, the Clean Energy Development Board under

10 V.S.A. § 6523

, each fuel efficiency service provider appointed under subsection 203a(b) of this title, each energy efficiency entity appointed under subdivision 209(d)(2) of this title, the Institute for Energy and the Environment at the Vermont Law School, the Transportation Research Center at the University of Vermont, and any other persons or entities that have requested notice. The Commission may provide notice to additional persons or entities.

In determining the disposition, allocation, and use of the revenues, the Commission shall consider each of the following potential uses of the revenues:

Development of in-state renewable energy resources.

Deposit into the Clean Energy Development Fund for use pursuant to section 8015 of this title.

Deposit into the Fuel Efficiency Fund for use pursuant to section 203a of this title.

Deposit into the Electric Efficiency Fund for use pursuant to section 209(d) of this title.

Application, for the benefit of ratepayers, to the revenue requirement of one or more Vermont retail electricity providers.

Development of transportation alternatives to vehicles that use gasoline such as electric or natural gas vehicles and supporting infrastructure and the coordination of such development with so-called “smart grid” electric transmission and distribution networks.

Any other uses that support the statutory policy and goals referenced in this subsection (b).

A Vermont retail electricity provider shall notify the Commission within 30 days of the first receipt of the revenues pursuant to an agreement, contract, memorandum of understanding, or other transaction under which it will receive the revenues. The Commission will open a proceeding under this section promptly on receipt of such notice and shall issue a final order in the proceeding within 12 months of such receipt.

Any of the revenues that are received prior to completion of the 12-month period described in subsection (c) of this section shall be credited, for the benefit of ratepayers, against the revenue requirement of the Vermont retail electricity provider that receives the revenues.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 13b, eff. June 4, 2010; amended

2011, No. 47

, §§ 18, 20m(a);

2017, No. 74

, § 127.

§ 8009.
Baseload renewable power portfolio requirement.

As used in this section:

“Baseload renewable power” means a plant that generates electricity from renewable energy; that, during normal operation, is capable of taking all or part of the minimum load on an electric transmission or distribution system; and that produces electricity essentially continuously at a constant rate.

“Baseload renewable power portfolio requirement” means the actual output of baseload renewable power from an in-state woody biomass plant that was commissioned prior to September 30, 2009, has a nominal capacity of 20.5 MW, and was in service as of January 1, 2011.

“Biomass” means organic nonfossil material of biological origin constituting a source of renewable energy within the meaning of subdivision 8002(21) of this title.

[Repealed.]

Notwithstanding subsection 8004(a) and subdivision 8005(c)(1) of this title, commencing November 1, 2012, each Vermont retail electricity provider shall purchase the provider’s pro rata share of the baseload renewable power portfolio requirement, which shall be based on the total Vermont retail kWh sales of all such providers for the previous calendar year. The obligation created by this subsection shall cease on November 1, 2024.

A plant used to satisfy the baseload renewable power portfolio requirement shall be a qualifying small power production facility under 16 U.S.C. § 796(17)(C) and 18 C.F.R. part 292.

The Commission shall determine the price to be paid to a plant used to satisfy the baseload renewable power portfolio requirement. The Commission shall not be required to make this determination as a contested case under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25. The price shall be the avoided cost of the Vermont composite electric utility system. In this subsection, the term “avoided cost” means the incremental cost to retail electricity providers of electric energy or capacity, or both, which, but for the purchase from the plant proposed to satisfy the baseload renewable power portfolio requirement, such providers would obtain from a source using the same generation technology as the proposed plant. In this subsection, the term “avoided cost” also includes the Commission’s consideration of each of the following:

The relevant cost data of the Vermont composite electric utility system.

The terms of the potential contract, including the duration of the obligation.

The availability, during the system’s daily and seasonal peak periods, of capacity or energy from a proposed plant.

The relationship of the availability of energy or capacity from the proposed plant to the ability of the Vermont composite electric utility system or a portion thereof to avoid costs.

The costs or savings resulting from variations in line losses from those that would have existed in the absence of purchases from the proposed plant.

The supply and cost characteristics of the proposed plant, including the costs of operation and maintenance of an existing plant during the term of a proposed contract.

In determining the price under subsection (d) of this section, the Commission may require a plant proposed to be used to satisfy the baseload renewable power portfolio requirement to produce such information as the Commission reasonably deems necessary.

With respect to a plant used to satisfy the baseload renewable power portfolio requirement:

The Standard Offer Facilitator shall purchase the baseload renewable power, and shall allocate the electricity purchased and any associated costs to the Vermont retail electricity providers based on their pro rata share of total Vermont retail kWh sales for the previous calendar year, and the Vermont retail electricity providers shall accept and pay those costs.

Any tradeable renewable energy credits attributable to the electricity purchased shall be transferred to the Vermont retail electricity providers in accordance with their pro rata share of the costs for such electricity as determined under subdivision (1) of this subsection.

All capacity rights attributable to the plant capacity associated with the electricity purchased shall be transferred to the Vermont retail electricity providers in accordance with their pro rata share of the costs for such electricity as determined under subdivision (1) of this subsection.

All reasonable costs of a Vermont retail electricity provider incurred under this section shall be included in the provider’s revenue requirement for purposes of ratemaking under sections 218, 218d, 225, and 227 of this title. In including such costs, the Commission shall appropriately account for any credits received under subdivision (2) of this subsection. Costs included in a retail electricity provider’s revenue requirement under this subdivision shall be allocated to the provider’s ratepayers as directed by the Commission.

A retail electricity provider shall be exempt from the requirements of this section if, and for so long as, one-third of the electricity supplied by the provider to its customers is from a plant that produces electricity from woody biomass.

The Commission may issue rules or orders to carry out this section.

The State and its instrumentalities shall not be liable to a plant owner or retail electricity provider with respect to any matter related to the baseload renewable power portfolio requirement or a plant used to satisfy such requirement, including costs associated with a contract related to such a plant or any damages arising from the breach of such a contract, the flow of power between a plant and the electric grid, or the interconnection of a plant to that grid. For the purpose of this section, the Commission and the Standard Offer Facilitator constitute instrumentalities of the State.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 47

, § 11; amended

2011, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2015, No. 56

, § 26;

2021, No. 39

, § 1, eff. May 20, 2021.

§ 8010.
Self-generation and net metering.

A customer may install and operate a net metering system in accordance with this section and the rules adopted under this section.

A net metering customer shall pay the same rates, fees, or other payments and be subject to the same conditions and requirements as all other purchasers from the interconnecting retail electricity provider in the same rate-class, except as this section or the rules adopted under this section may provide, and except for appropriate and necessary conditions approved by the Commission for the safety and reliability of the electric distribution system.

In accordance with this section, the Commission shall adopt and implement rules that govern the installation and operation of net metering systems.

The rules shall establish and maintain a net metering program that:

advances the goals and total renewables targets of this chapter and the goals of

10 V.S.A. § 578

(greenhouse gas reduction) and is consistent with the criteria of subsection 248(b) of this title;

achieves a level of deployment that is consistent with the recommendations of the Electrical Energy and Comprehensive Energy Plans under sections 202 and 202b of this title, unless the Commission determines that this level is inconsistent with the goals and targets identified in subdivision (1)(A) of this subsection (c). Under this subdivision (B), the Commission shall consider the Plans most recently issued at the time the Commission adopts or amends the rules;

to the extent feasible, ensures that net metering does not shift costs included in each retail electricity provider’s revenue requirement between net metering customers and other customers;

accounts for all costs and benefits of net metering, including the potential for net metering to contribute toward relieving supply constraints in the transmission and distribution systems and to reduce consumption of fossil fuels for heating and transportation;

ensures that all customers who want to participate in net metering have the opportunity to do so;

balances, over time, the pace of deployment and cost of the program with the program’s impact on rates;

accounts for changes over time in the cost of technology; and

allows a customer to retain ownership of the environmental attributes of energy generated by the customer’s net metering system and of any associated tradeable renewable energy credits or to transfer those attributes and credits to the interconnecting retail provider, and:

if the customer retains the attributes, reduces the value of the credit provided under this section for electricity generated by the customer’s net metering system by an appropriate amount; and

if the customer transfers the attributes to the interconnecting provider, requires the provider to retain them for application toward compliance with sections 8004 and 8005 of this title.

The rules shall include provisions that govern:

whether there is a limit on the cumulative plant capacity of net metering systems to be installed over time and what that limit is, if any;

the transfer of certificates of public good issued for net metering systems and the abandonment of net metering systems;

the respective duties of retail electricity providers and net metering customers;

the electrical safety, power quality, interconnection, and metering of net metering systems;

the formation of group net metering systems, the resolution of disputes between group net metering customers and the interconnecting provider, and the billing, crediting, and disconnection of group net metering customers by the interconnecting provider; and

the amount of the credit to be assigned to each kWh of electricity generated by a net metering customer in excess of the electricity supplied by the interconnecting provider to the customer, the manner in which the customer’s credit will be applied on the customer’s bill, and the period during which a net metering customer must use the credit, after which the credit shall revert to the interconnecting provider.

When assigning an amount of credit under this subdivision (F), the Commission shall consider making multiple lengths of time available over which a customer may take a credit and differentiating the amount according to the length of time chosen. For example, a monthly credit amount may be higher if taken over 10 years and lower if taken over 20 years. Factors relevant to this consideration shall include the customer’s ability to finance the net metering system, the cost of that financing, and the net present value to all ratepayers of the net metering program.

In this subdivision (ii), “existing net metering system” means a net metering system for which a complete application was filed before January 1, 2017.

Commencing 10 years from the date on which an existing net metering system was installed, the Commission may apply to the system the same rules governing bill credits and the use of those credits on the customer’s bill that it applies to net metering systems for which applications were filed on or after January 1, 2017, other than any adjustments related to siting and tradeable renewable energy credits.

This subdivision (ii) shall apply to existing net metering systems notwithstanding any contrary provision of

1 V.S.A. § 214

and 2014 Acts and Resolves No. 99, Sec. 10.

The rules shall establish standards and procedures governing application for and issuance or revocation of a certificate of public good for net metering systems under the provisions of section 248 of this title. In establishing these standards and procedures:

The rules may waive the requirements of section 248 of this title that are not applicable to net metering systems, including criteria that are generally applicable to public service companies as defined in this title.

The rules may modify notice and hearing requirements of this title as the Commission considers appropriate.

The rules shall seek to simplify the application and review process as appropriate, including simplifying the application and review process to encourage group net metering systems when the system is at least 50 percent owned by the customers who receive the bill credits for the electricity generated by the system.

With respect to net metering systems that exceed 150 kW in plant capacity, the rules shall apply the so-called “Quechee” test for aesthetic impact as described by the Vermont Supreme Court in the case of In re Halnon, 174 Vt. 515 (2002) (mem.). The rules and application form shall state the components of this test.

The rules shall not waive or include provisions that are less stringent than the requirements of subdivision 248(a)(4)(J) (required information) of this title.

This subdivision (F) applies to an application for a net metering system with a capacity that is greater than 15 kilowatts, unless the system is located on a new or existing structure the primary purpose of which is not the generation of electricity. With respect to such a system, the rules shall not waive or include provisions that are less stringent than each of the following:

the requirement of subdivision 248(a)(4)(C) of this title to provide a copy of the application to the Agencies of Agriculture, Food and Markets and of Natural Resources; the Department of Public Service; the Division for Historic Preservation; the municipal legislative body; and the municipal and regional planning commissions; and

the requirements of subsection 248(f) (preapplication submittal) of this title.

This section does not require the Commission to adopt identical requirements for the service territory of each retail electricity provider.

Each retail electricity provider shall implement net metering in its service territory through a rate schedule that is consistent with this section and the rules adopted under this section and is approved by the Commission.

Commencing in 2021 and biennially thereafter, the Department shall submit to the Commission its evaluation of the current state of net metering in Vermont, which shall be included within the Department’s Annual Energy Report required under subsection 202b(e) of this title and shall also be submitted to the Committees listed under subdivision 202b(e)(2) of this title. The evaluation shall:

analyze the current pace of net metering deployment, both statewide and within the service territory of each retail electricity provider;

after considering the goals and policies of this chapter, of

10 V.S.A. § 578

(greenhouse gas reduction), of section 202a (State energy policy) of this title, and of the Electrical Energy and Comprehensive Energy Plans under sections 202 and 202b of this title, recommend the future pace of net metering deployment statewide and within the service territory of each provider;

analyze the existence and degree of cross-subsidy between net metering customers and other customers on a statewide and on an individual provider basis;

evaluate the effect of net metering on retail electricity provider infrastructure and revenue;

evaluate the benefits to net metering customers of connecting to the provider’s distribution system;

analyze the economic and environmental benefits of net metering, and the short- and long-term impacts on rates, both statewide and for each provider;

analyze the reliability and supply diversification costs and benefits of net metering;

evaluate the ownership and transfer of the environmental attributes of energy generated by net metering systems and of any associated tradeable renewable energy credits; and

examine and evaluate best practices for net metering identified from other states.

If a hydroelectric generation plant seeking approval as a net metering system is subject to licensing jurisdiction under the Federal Power Act, 16 U.S.C. chapter 12, subchapter 1, the Commission shall require the plant to obtain such approval through means other than by application for a certificate of public good under section 248 of this title.

Except for net metering systems for which the Commission has established a registration process, the Commission shall issue a final determination as to an uncontested application within 90 days of the date of the last substantive filing by a party.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 99

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 2017; amended

2015, No. 56

, § 12, eff. Jan. 2, 2017;

2015, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. Jan. 2, 2017;

2017, No. 42

, § 7, eff. May 22, 2017;

2019, No. 31

, § 6;

2019, No. 81

, § 5.

§ 8011.
Energy storage facilities.

The Commission may adopt and implement rules that govern the installation and operation of energy storage facilities of all sizes.

The rules may establish a size threshold below which storage facilities need not submit an application for a certificate of public good pursuant to section 248 of this title.

The rules may include provisions that govern:

the respective duties of retail electricity providers and energy storage facility owners or operators;

the electrical and fire safety, power quality, interconnection, metering, and decommissioning of energy storage facilities;

the resolution of disputes between energy storage facility owners, operators, and the interconnecting provider;

energy storage aggregators and the operation of aggregations; and

energy storage facilities paired with other resources, such as net metering and standard offer plants, including retrofits of existing plants.

The rules shall establish standards and procedures governing application for and issuance or revocation of a certificate of public good for certain energy storage facilities under the provisions of section 248 of this title. In establishing these standards and procedures, the rules may:

waive the requirements of section 248 of this title that are not applicable to energy storage facilities, including criteria that are generally applicable to public service companies as defined in this title;

modify notice and hearing requirements of this title as the Commission considers appropriate; and

seek to simplify the application and review process.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 54

, § 11.

§§ 8012-8014.
[Reserved for future use]